Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2008
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Secretary of State; filing duty.

(1) If a document delivered to the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the requirements of section 21-2003, the Secretary of State shall file it.

(2) The Secretary of State shall file such document by stamping or otherwise endorsing Filed, together with his or her name and official title and the date and time of receipt, on both the original and the document copy. After filing a document, except as provided in sections 21-2033 and 21-20,176, the Secretary of State shall deliver the document copy with the acknowledgment of receipt of the filing fee, if a fee is required, to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative.

(3) If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, he or she shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within five days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for his or her refusal.

(4) The Secretary of State's duty to file documents under this section shall be ministerial. His or her filing or refusal to file a document shall not:

(a) Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

(b) Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

(c) Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 8.